fr: Classe de taille de la housse de moto: Aventure/Double usage; Cruiser; Très grand (XL); Scooter; Petite moto; Moto de sport; Moto standard; Touring; Trois-roues; Autre
pl: Pokrowiec na motocykl klasy rozmiarowej: Adventure / dual-sport; Cruiser; Bardzo duży (XL); Skuter; Mały motocykl; Motocykl sportowy; Standardowy motocykl; Turystyczny; Trajka; Inne
sv: Storleksklass för motorcykelskydd: Äventyr/dual-sport; Cruiser; Extra large (XL); Scooter; Liten motorcykel; Sportcykel; Standardmotorcykel; Touring; Trike; Övrigt
ru: Класс размера чехла для мотоцикла: Турэндуро / двойного назначения; Круизер; Очень большой (XL); Скутер; Малокубатурный мотоцикл; Спортбайк; Стандартный мотоцикл; Туристический; Трайк; Другое
cs: Třída velikosti plachty na motocykl: Adventure/Dual-sport; Cruiser; Extra velké (XL); Skútr; Malý motocykl; Sportovní motocykl; Standardní motocykl; Touring; Tříkolka; Jiné
es: Tamaño de funda para motocicleta: Aventura/doble propósito; Crucero; Extragrande (XL); Scooter; Motocicleta pequeña; Motocicleta deportiva; Motocicleta estándar; Turismo; Triciclo; Otro
da: Størrelsesklasse for motorcykelcover: Adventure/dual-sport; Cruiser; Ekstra stor (XL); Scooter; Lille motorcykel; Sportscykel; Standardmotorcykel; Touring; Trike; Andet
ro-RO: Clasa de dimensiune a husei pentru motocicletă: Aventură/Dual-sport; Cruiser; Foarte mare (XL); Scuter; Motocicletă mică; Motocicletă sport; Motocicletă standard; Touring; Triciclu; Altele
zh-TW: 機車車罩尺寸等級: 探險/雙重運動; 巡航車; 特大 (XL); 速克達; 小型摩托車; 運動型摩托車; 標準摩托車; 巡迴旅行車; 三輪摩托車; 其他
it: Classe di dimensioni del telo coprimoto: Adventure/Dual-sport; Cruiser; Extra large (XL); Scooter; Moto piccola; Moto sportiva; Moto standard; Touring; Trike; Altro
pt-PT: classe de tamanho de capa para motociclo: Aventura/dual-sport; Cruiser; Extra grande (XL); Scooter; Motociclo pequeno; Moto desportiva; Motociclo padrão; Turismo; Triciclo; Outro
tr: Motosiklet örtüsü beden sınıfı: Macera/çift amaçlı; Cruiser; Ekstra büyük (XL); Scooter; Küçük motosiklet; Spor motosiklet; Standart motosiklet; Touring; Trike; Diğer
th: ขนาดของผ้าคลุมรถจักรยานยนต์: แอดเวนเจอร์/ดูอัลสปอร์ต; ครุยเซอร์; ใหญ่พิเศษ (XL); สกู๊ตเตอร์; มอเตอร์ไซค์ขนาดเล็ก; สปอร์ตไบก์; มอเตอร์ไซค์มาตรฐาน; ทัวร์ริ่ง; มอเตอร์ไซค์สามล้อ; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 摩托车罩尺寸等级: 探险/全地形; 巡航车; 特大号 (XL); 踏板车; 小型摩托车; 跑车; 标准摩托车; 旅行车; 正三轮摩托车; 其他
nl: Motorhoes maatklasse: Adventure/dual-sport; Cruiser; Extra large (XL); Scooter; Kleine motorfiets; Sportmotor; Standaardmotorfiets; Touring; Trike; Overig
ja: オートバイカバーのサイズクラス: アドベンチャー/デュアルスポーツ; クルーザー; エクストララージ (XL); スクーター; 小型バイク; スポーツバイク; スタンダードバイク; ツーリング; トライク; その他
ko: 오토바이 커버 크기  등급: 어드벤처/듀얼 스포츠; 크루저; 특대형(XL); 스쿠터; 소형 오토바이; 스포츠 바이크; 표준형 오토바이; 투어링; 트라이크; 기타
en: Motorcycle cover size class: Adventure/Dual-sport; Cruiser; Extra large (XL); Scooter; Small motorcycle; Sport bike; Standard motorcycle; Touring; Trike; Other
bg-BG: Размерен клас на покривало за мотоциклет: Приключенски/Двоен спорт (Dual-sport); Круизър; Много голям (XL); Скутер; Малък мотоциклет; Спортен мотоциклет; Стандартен мотоциклет; Туринг; Триколка; Друго
vi: Kích thước bạt che xe máy: Đa địa hình/thể thao kép; Xe tuần dương (Cruiser); Cực lớn (XL); Xe tay ga; Xe mô-tô nhỏ; Xe thể thao; Xe mô-tô tiêu chuẩn; Xe đường trường; Xe ba bánh; Khác
lt-LT: Motociklo uždangalo dydžio klasė: Nuotykių / dvigubos paskirties; Kruizeris; Ypač didelis (XL); Skuteris; Mažas motociklas; Sportinis motociklas; Standartinis motociklas; Turistinis motociklas; Triratis; Kita
hu: Motorkerékpár-takaró méretosztálya: Túra/enduró (Dual-sport); Cruiser; Extra nagy (XL); Robogó; Kismotor; Sportmotor; Normál motorkerékpár; Túra; Trikebike (háromkerekű); Egyéb
nb: Størrelsesklasse for motorsykkeltrekk: Adventure / dual-sport; Cruiser; Ekstra stor (XL); Scooter; Liten motorsykkel; Sportssykkel; Standard motorsykkel; Touring; Trike; Annet
sl-SI: Razred velikosti ponjave za motorno kolo: Adventure / Dual-sport; Cruiser; Zelo veliko (XL); Skuter; Majhen motocikel; Športni motocikel; Standardni motocikel; Touring; Trikolesnik; Drugo
de: Größenklasse der Motorradabdeckung: Adventure/Dual-Sport; Cruiser; Extra groß (XL); Roller; Kleines Motorrad; Sportmotorrad; Standardmotorrad; Touring; Trike; Sonstige
fi: Moottoripyöräpeitteen kokoluokka: Seikkailu / dual-sport; Cruiser; Erittäin suuri (XL); Skootteri; Pieni moottoripyörä; Urheilumoottoripyörä; Vakiomoottoripyörä; Matkapyörä; Kolmipyörä (trike); Muu
el: Κατηγορία μεγέθους καλύμματος μοτοσυκλέτας: Adventure/Dual-sport; Cruiser; Extra large (XL); Σκούτερ; Μικρή μοτοσικλέτα; Sport μοτοσικλέτα; Συμβατική μοτοσικλέτα; Touring; Τρίκυκλο; Άλλο
pt-BR: Capa para motocicleta classe de tamanho: Aventura/uso misto; Cruiser; Extragrande (GG); Scooter; Moto pequena; Moto esportiva; Moto padrão; Turismo; Triciclo; Outros
hr-HR: Navlaka za motocikl veličina klase: Adventure / Dual-sport; Cruiser; Ekstra veliko (XL); Skuter; Mali motocikl; Sportski motocikl; Standardni motocikl; Touring; Trike; Ostalo
sk-SK: Trieda veľkosti plachty na motocykel: Adventure/Enduro; Cruiser; Extra veľké (XL); Skúter; Malý motocykel; Športový motocykel; Štandardný motocykel; Turistický motocykel; Trojkolka; Iné